Maryland, session 2026, HB1635.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
1–202.
(A) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT THE MANAGEMENT AND
OPERATION OF A DETENTION FACILITY INVOLVES FUNCTIONS THAT ARE
INHERENTLY GOVERNMENTAL AND THAT SUCH FUNCTIONS REQUIRE THE EXERCISE
OF COERCIVE POLICE POWERS OVER INDIVIDUALS WHICH SHOULD NOT BE
DELEGATED TO THE PRIVATE SECTOR AND ARE DISTINGUISHABLE FROM
PRIVATIZATION IN OTHER AREAS OF GOVERNMENT.
(B) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1635*

HOUSE BILL 1635
(2) “DETENTION FACILITY” INCLUDES:
(I) A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY;
(II) AN IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITY; OR
(III) ANY OTHER FACILITY USED TO DETAIN INDIVIDUALS.
(3) (I) “ANCILLARY SERVICES” INCLUDE:
1. EDUCATION SERVICES;
2. MEDICAL SERVICES; AND
3. MAINTENANCE SERVICES.
(II) “ANCILLARY SERVICES” DO NOT INCLUDE FOOD SERVICES.
(C) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A CONTRACT TO PROVIDE
ANCILLARY SERVICES AT A DETENTION FACILITY.
(D) THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, THE STATE, A UNIT OF LOCAL
GOVERNMENT, A COUNTY SHERIFF, AN AGENCY, OFFICER, EMPLOYEE, OR AGENT OF
THE STATE OR A UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT, OR A COMPANY ACTING IN
ACCORDANCE WITH A CONTRACT WITH THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, THE STATE, A
UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT, OR A COUNTY SHERIFF MAY NOT:
(1) ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT OF ANY KIND FOR THE DETENTION
OF INDIVIDUALS IN A DETENTION FACILITY OWNED, MANAGED, OR OPERATED, IN
WHOLE OR IN PART, BY A PRIVATE ENTITY;
(2) PAY, REIMBURSE, SUBSIDIZE, OR DEFRAY IN ANY WAY ANY COSTS
RELATED TO THE SALE, PURCHASE, CONSTRUCTION, DEVELOPMENT, OWNERSHIP,
MANAGEMENT, OR OPERATION OF A DETENTION FACILITY THAT IS OR WILL BE
OWNED, MANAGED, OR OPERATED, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, BY A PRIVATE ENTITY;
(3) RECEIVE ANY PAYMENT RELATED TO THE DETENTION OF
INDIVIDUALS IN A DETENTION FACILITY OWNED, MANAGED, OR OPERATED, IN
WHOLE OR IN PART, BY A PRIVATE ENTITY; OR
(4) OTHERWISE GIVE A FINANCIAL INCENTIVE OR BENEFIT TO A
PRIVATE ENTITY OR PERSON IN CONNECTION WITH THE SALE, PURCHASE,
CONSTRUCTION, DEVELOPMENT, OWNERSHIP, MANAGEMENT, OR OPERATION OF A

HOUSE BILL 1635 3
DETENTION FACILITY THAT IS OR WILL BE OWNED, MANAGED, OR OPERATED, IN
WHOLE OR IN PART, BY A PRIVATE ENTITY.
(E) THE STATE, A UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT, OR AN AGENCY, OFFICER,
EMPLOYEE, OR AGENT OF THE STATE OR A UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY NOT
APPROVE A ZONING VARIANCE OR ISSUE A PERMIT FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF A
BUILDING OR THE REUSE OF EXISTING BUILDINGS OR STRUCTURES BY ANY PRIVATE
ENTITY FOR USE AS A DETENTION FACILITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.